src/phonology/olo-phon.xfscript
! This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.
! It gives the morphophonological rules for Veps.


! In this file, testcases are marked as follows:

! space exclmark euro space upper:lower
! Please add tests for eventual new rules or problems

! To test: in kt/vep/src, do:
! xfst -e "source xfst-vep.txt"
! invert net
! save s
! quit
! cat xfst-vep.txt | grep €|cut -d" " -f3|cut -d":" -f1|lookup s


clear stack


! Definition section !
! ================== !

echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | f | g | h | j | k | l 
           | B | C | Č | D | F | G | H | J | K | L 
           | m | n | p | r | s | š | t | v | z | ž
           | M | N | P | R | S | Š | T | V | Z | Ž ] ;

define FrontVws [ü | y | ä | ö | Ü | Y | Ä | Ö ] ;

define BackVws [a | o | u | A | O | U ] ;

define NeutralVws [ e | i | E | I ] ;

define Vws [ NeutralVws | FrontVws | BackVws ] ;

define BackContext [ Cns | BackVws | NeutralVws ] ;

define FrontContext [ Cns | FrontVws | NeutralVws ] ;

define Softie [ ’ ] ; ! soft sign

define Lts [ Cns | Vws | Softie ] ; !

define Dummy [ %> | %^WEAK ] ; 



! Rule section !
! ============ !

echo << THE RULES >>


define VowelCorrelation [ V1 -> а || [ QAO1 ]  %> h _ ,,
                          V1 -> e || [ i ] %> h _ ,,
                          V1 -> e || [ QEQ ]  %> h _  ,,
                          V1 -> o || o %> h _   ] ; ! Vowel harmony

define StemFinalVowelLoss [ QAO1 -> 0 , QEQ -> 0 || _ .#. ] ;
 !€ ты>хА1на:тэхэна

define WEAK [ n d -> n n , l d -> l l || _ Vws %^WEAK ,,
              d -> 0 || Vws _ Vws %^WEAK ] ;

define D2nlr [ d -> n || n %> _ ,,
               d -> l || l %> _ ,,
               d -> r || r %> _ ] ;
! d might be substituted by D1

define N2lr [ n -> l || l %> _ ,,
              n -> r || r %> _ ] ;
! n might be substituted by N1

define FrontHarmonyInStem [ U1 -> y , O1 -> ö , A1 -> ä || [ .#. \[ BackVws ]* | FrontVws ] FrontContext*  Cns+ _ ] ;

define BackHarmonyInStem [ U1 -> u , O1 -> o , A1 -> a || [ .#. \[ FrontVws ]* | BackVws ] BackContext*  Cns+ _ ] ;

define FrontHarmony [ U1 -> y , O1 -> ö , A1 -> ä || [ .#. \[ BackVws ]* | FrontVws ] [ FrontContext*  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> FrontContext* Cns+ |  FrontContext* Cns+  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> FrontContext* ] _ ,,
            O1 -> ö || FrontVws [ FrontContext*  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> FrontContext* Cns+ |  FrontContext* Cns+  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> FrontContext* ] U1 _ ,,
            A1 -> ä || ä %> _ ,,
            A1 -> e || e %> _ ,,
            A1 -> i || FrontVws  FrontContext* ( %^WEAK ) %>  i %> _ ] ;

define BackHarmony [ U1 -> u , O1 -> o , A1 -> a || BackVws [ BackContext* ( %^WEAK ) (%> i ) %> BackContext* Cns+ |  BackContext* Cns+ ( %^WEAK ) (%> i ) %> BackContext* ] _ ,,
            O1 -> o || BackVws [ BackContext*  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> BackContext* Cns+ |  BackContext* Cns+  (%> i ) ( %^WEAK ) %> BackContext* ] U1 _ ,,
 A1 -> a || a %> _ ,,
 A1 -> o || o %> _ ] ;

define QAO [ QAO1 -> a || _ %> [ n | d | t a | k s | l | h V1 | n n o | d m e | s ] ,,
            QAO1 -> o || _ %> i ] ;

define a2o [ a -> o || [ .#. | Cns ] [ a ( u | i ) | e | i ] Cns+ _ ( %^WEAK ) %> i ] ;

define a2Zero [ a -> 0 || _ ( %^WEAK ) %> e ] ;

define e2Zero [ e -> 0 , ä -> 0 || _ ( %^WEAK ) %> i ] ;

!define VowelHarmony [ A1 -> a || BackVws [ BackVws | Cns ]+ [BackVws | Cns | NeutralVws ]* %> [ t (t) ] _  ,,
!                  A1 -> ä || FrontVws [ FrontVws | Cns ]+ [FrontVws | Cns | NeutralVws ]* %> [ t (t) ] _   ] ;


define VOICING     [ t -> d , k -> g || [ Vws | n | l | r ] %> _ [ Vws ] ,,
                     z -> s || Vws _ %> [ t | k ] ] ; ! in verb stems
 !€ sugi>ta:sugida
 !€ vali^DEVOICE>ta:valita

define DEVOICE [ %^DEVOICE -> 0 ||  _ ] ;

define o2u [ o -> u || _ ( %^WEAK ) %> o ,,
             e -> i || _ ( %^WEAK ) %> e ] ;

define SecondaryDiphthongsa2u [ a -> u ||  _ [ a  ( %^WEAK ) | %> a]  ,,
             ä -> i ||  _  [ ä ( %^WEAK ) | %> ä ]  ,,
             ä -> i ||  i %> _  ,,
             e -> i || _ [ e ] ( %^WEAK ) | %> ä  ] ;

define Gradation [ k k -> 0 k , t t -> 0 t || _ Vws %^WEAK ] ;


define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;



read regex [

    VowelCorrelation
.o. StemFinalVowelLoss
.o. WEAK
.o. D2nlr
.o. N2lr
.o. FrontHarmonyInStem
.o. BackHarmonyInStem
.o. FrontHarmony
.o. BackHarmony
.o. QAO
.o. a2o
.o. a2Zero
.o. e2Zero
!.o. VowelHarmony
.o. VOICING
.o. DEVOICE
.o. o2u
.o. SecondaryDiphthongsa2u
.o. Gradation
.o. DummyDeletion
] ;
